Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
Acts 2001, No. 1814, § 5: Apr. 18, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that many state and public school employees participate in benefits offered through a cafeteria plan; that many state and public school employees participate in voluntary health, disability and other insurance programs; that the Employee Benefits Division of the Department of Finance and Administration is charged with the responsibility of administering these plans; that the existing law governing these plans is in need of clarification in order to allow the Employee Benefits Division to obtain bids for these programs at the lowest possible rates; that state and public school employees are in need of obtaining these programs at the lowest possible rates; and, that this act is necessary in order to achieve those objectives. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 826, § 4: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that unreimbursed expenses are being withdrawn from the State Employees Benefits Trust Fund of the State and Public School Employees Insurance Fund; that this act is needed to prevent confusion and uncertainty concerning these funds; and that this act is immediately necessary to recover costs to the State Employees Benefits Trust Fund of the State and Public School Employees Insurance Fund as required by law. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Identical Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 3 and 6, § 5: Oct. 21, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Public School Insurance Trust Fund is inadequate to provide affordable health insurance for public school employees; that an urgent need exists to address the administration and funding of public school employee health insurance plans in order to avoid severe financial hardship to plan participants; that enrollment for the 2014 plan year has been delayed as long as feasible to permit more time to develop a proper short-term and long-term solution; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide affordable health insurance options to the state's public school employees in a timely fashion. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act is immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on: (1) The date of this act's approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2014, No. 293, § 43: July 1, 2014, except § 40, effective Mar. 13, 2014. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2014 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided; with the exception that SECTION 40 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2014 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs, with the exception that SECTION 40 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2014; with the exception that SECTION 40 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Identical Acts 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 7, § 5: July 3, 2014, § 1 only.Emergency clause provided:“It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program requires fundamental restructuring to ensure that affordable health insurance options are available to state and public school employees; that an urgent need exists to start implementing the necessary reforms to the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program; and that Section 1 of this act is immediately necessary to improve the financial viability of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Section 1 of this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 242, § 2: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the effectiveness of this act is essential to finance and the operations of state government; that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration of essential government programs; and that this act is necessary because it ensures the timely administration of government programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program is established to manage life and health insurance plan options for the benefit of state employees, state employee retirees, public school employees, and public school employee retirees.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to:

Set and manage policies for the program;

Work in a concerted effort toward a common goal of parity between public school and state employee insurance programs;

Improve the quality of healthcare services under the program;

Increase participants' understanding of program features by educating state employees, state employee retirees, public school employees, and public school employee retirees on the program and plan options available under the program, including the advantages and disadvantages of each available plan option; and

Slow the rate of growth of healthcare expenses under the program.

Publisher's Notes. Former §21-5-401, concerning the State Employees Insurance Advisory Committee, was deemed to be repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 9. The former section was derived from Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3101.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment, in (1), substituted “set policy and select plans and coverages for” for “manage,” and inserted “and life,” “health care options, and utilize” and “and in the best interest of state employees and public school personnel”; and substituted “set and manage policies for” for “manage” in (3).

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 added “State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program established” to the beginning of the section heading; added (a); redesignated the former undesignated paragraph as (b); rewrote (b)(1); in (b)(2), substituted “plan options that” for “programs to” and “participants” for “plan members”; substituted “program” for “health insurance and life insurance programs of state and public school employees” in (b)(3)(A); in (b)(3)(C), substituted “healthcare” for “health care” and “program” for “programs”; inserted “by educating state employees … each available plan option” in (b)(3)(D); and, in (b)(3)(E), substituted “of healthcare” for “in health care” and “program” for “programs”.

Recommendations by a state board as to the adoption of a mail order service and change in the reimbursement rates of a pharmacy service plan for state and public school employees did not constitute “rule-making” within §25-15-202 of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., and accordingly, the notice and hearing provisions therein did not have to be complied with; such recommendations were within the board's legislatively mandated duties pursuant to this section. Arkansas Pharmacist's Ass'n v. Arkansas State & Pub. Sch. Life and Hlth. Ins. Bd., 352 Ark. 1, 98 S.W.3d 27 (2003).

(1)The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board is created, composed of the following fifteen (15) voting members:

A state employee who is eligible to participate in the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program, appointed by the Governor;

Two (2) public school employees, at least one (1) of whom is employed by a rural school district, appointed by the Governor;

The Insurance Commissioner or his or her designee;

The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education or his or her designee;

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration or his or her designee;

Three (3) members who are engaged in employee benefits management or risk management, at least one (1) of whom is a licensed healthcare provider, appointed by the Governor;

Two (2) members, one (1) of whom is a retired public school employee and one (1) of whom is a retired state employee, appointed by the Governor;

One (1) public school employee who is employed by a school district as an administrator, appointed by the Governor;

The Director of the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy or his or her state employee pharmacist designee;

The Director of Health Facility Services of the Department of Health or his or her designee; and

One (1) member who is a member of the Arkansas Medical, Dental, and Pharmaceutical Association, appointed by the Governor.

All appointments made by the Governor are subject to confirmation by the Senate.

An appointee who has a conflict of interest is disqualified to serve on the board.

(1)Members appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years but may be reappointed for additional terms.

Members appointed by the Governor shall serve at the will of the Governor.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 2, subdivision (b)(1) began:

As enacted by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 3, subsection (c) began:

“The initial chairman and vice chairman of the board shall be designated by the Governor for terms of one year. Subsequent….”

Identical Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 3 and 6, § 4, provided:

“(a)The term of a member who is on the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board on October 16, 2013 shall expire on November 30, 2013.

“(b)New board membership under §21-5-402 shall be seated on December 1, 2013.

“(c)The Governor shall call the first meeting of the newly seated board on or after December 1, 2013.”

Publisher's Notes. Former §21-5-402, concerning appointment and terms of committee members, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 9. The former section was derived from Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, §§ 2, 3; 1975, No. 575, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 749, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 838, §§ 3, 4; 1983, No. 668, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3102, 12-3103; Acts 1987, No. 844, §§ 1, 2; 1991, No. 867, § 2.

Amendments. The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 added “Creation of board” to the beginning of the section heading; in the introductory language of (a)(1), deleted “There is created” from the beginning, inserted “is created” following “Board,” and substituted “fourteen (14)” for “twelve (12)”; deleted “to be” following “subchapter” in (a)(1)(A); deleted “to be” following “teacher” in (a)(1)(B); in (a)(1)(F), substituted “Three (3) members who are” for “One (1) member who is” and deleted “to be” following “industry”; deleted “to be” following “administrator” in (a)(1)(H); inserted present (a)(2) and redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(3); in (a)(3), substituted “An” for “However, any,” substituted “is” for “shall be,” and added “on the board” to the end; deleted “All” from the beginning of (b)(1); and, in (b)(2)(A), substituted “A vacancy in a position appointed by the Governor” for “Vacancies in the Governor-appointed positions” and “by” for “of”.

The 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 substituted “fifteen (15)” for “fourteen (14)” in the introductory language of (a)(1); substituted “State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program” for “insurance program under this subchapter” in (a)(1)(A); substituted “Two (2) public school employees, at least one (1) of whom is employed by a rural school district” for “A certified classroom teacher” in (a)(1)(B); substituted “at least one (1) of whom is a licensed healthcare provider” for “in private industry” in (a)(1)(F); substituted “members, one (1) of whom is a retired public school employee and one (1) of whom is” for “additional member positions that shall be filled by a retired teacher and by” in (a)(1)(G); inserted “employee who is employed by a school district as an” in (a)(1)(H); and substituted “member of the Arkansas Medical, Dental, and Pharmaceutical Association, appointed by the Governor” for “licensed health care provider appointed by the Governor” in (a)(1)(K).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Commissioner of Education” in (a)(1)(D); substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a)(1)(E); and deleted “Executive” preceding “Director” in (a)(1)(I).

A chair and vice chair of the board shall be selected annually by and from the membership of the board and shall serve no more than two (2) years.

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board is a policy-making body only.

The Director of the Employee Benefits Division and the board shall report upon request to the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce regarding the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program.

Publisher's Notes. Former §21-5-403, concerning compensation of committee members, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 9. The former section was derived from Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3105.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “State and Public School LIfe and Health Insurance Board” for “board” in (a); and, in (b), deleted “board through the” preceding “executive” and substituted “upon request” for “at least quarterly.”

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 substituted “is” for “shall be” in (a); and, in (b), substituted “Executive Director of the Employee Benefits Division of the Department of Finance and Administration and the board” for “executive director” and “State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program” for “state and public school employees and retirees insurance program”.

The 2019 amendment, in (b), deleted “Executive” preceding “Director” and deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Employee Benefits Division”.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 688, § 13; 2011, No. 1017, § 7; 2017, No. 365, § 19; 2019, No. 910, § 6131.